pt-BR: Tamanho da touca da peruca: Médio; Médio/Grande; Personalizado; Grande; Pequeno; Pequeno/Médio; Outro
th: ขนาดหมวก: กลาง; กลาง/ใหญ่; กำหนดเอง; ใหญ่; เล็ก; เล็ก/กลาง; อื่นๆ
sv: Lockstorlek: Medel; Medel/stor; Anpassad; Stor; Petite; Petite/medel; Annat
ko: 캡 크기: 평균; 평균/대형; 맞춤; 대형; 소형; 소형/평균; 기타
ro-RO: Dimensiunea capacului: Mediu; Mediu/Mare; Personalizat; Mare; Mic; Mic/Mediu; Altele
ru: Размер шапочки: Средний; Средний/большой; Индивидуальный; Большой; Маленький; Маленький/средний; Другое
bg-BG: Размер на шапката: Среден; Среден/голям; По поръчка; Голям; Малък; Малък/среден; Друго
zh-TW: 帽子尺寸: 一般; 一般/大號; 自訂; 大號; 偏小; 偏小/一般; 其他
nl: Kap maat: Gemiddeld; Gemiddeld/groot; Op maat; Groot; Petite; Petite/gemiddeld; Overige
it: Cap taglia: Media; Media/Grande; Personalizzata; Grande; Piccola; Piccola/Media; Altro
cs: Velikost čepice: Průměrné; Průměrné/velké; Vlastní; Velké; Drobné; Drobné/průměrné; Jiné
fr: Taille de la casquette: Moyen; Moyen/grand; Personnalisé; Grand; Petit; Petit/moyen; Autre
sk-SK: Veľkosť viečka: Stredná; Stredná/veľká; Vlastná; Veľká; Malá; Malá/stredná; Iná
es: Talla de la gorra: Promedio; Promedio/grande; Personalizada; Grande; Pequeña; Pequeña/promedio; Otro
hr-HR: Veličina kape: Prosječno; Prosječno / veliko; Prilagođeno; Veliko; Petite; Petite / prosječno; Ostalo
da: Lågstørrelse: Mellem; Mellem/stor; Specialtilpasset; Stor; Lille; Lille/mellem; Andet
zh-CN: 帽子尺码: 中码; 中/大码; 定制; 大码; 小码; 小/中码; 其他
vi: Kích thước mũ: Trung bình; Trung bình/Lớn; Tùy chỉnh; Lớn; Nhỏ; Nhỏ/Trung bình; Khác
pl: Rozmiar czapki: Średni; Średni/duży; Niestandardowy; Duży; Mały; Mały/średni; Inne
ja: キャップサイズ: アベレージ; アベレージ/ラージ; カスタム; ラージ; ペティート; ペティート/アベレージ; その他
lt-LT: Kepurės dydis: Vidutinis; Vidutinis / didelis; Pasirinktinis; Didelis; Smulkus; Smulkus / vidutinis; Kita
de: Kappengröße: Mittel; Mittel/Groß; Maßgefertigt; Groß; Klein; Klein/Mittel; Sonstige
el: Μέγεθος καπέλου: Μεσαίο; Μεσαίο/Μεγάλο; Προσαρμοσμένο; Μεγάλο; Petite; Petite/Μεσαίο; Άλλο
sl-SI: Velikost pokrovčka: Srednja; Srednja/velika; Po meri; Velika; Majhna (petite); Majhna/srednja; Drugo
hu: Fejkörméret: Átlagos; Átlagos/Nagy; Egyedi; Nagy; Petite; Petite/Átlagos; Egyéb
tr: Bone bedeni: Ortalama; Ortalama/büyük; Özel; Büyük; Minyon; Minyon/ortalama; Diğer
nb: Lokkstørrelse: Middels; Middels/stor; Spesialtilpasset; Stor; Petite; Petite/middels; Annet
fi: Korkin koko: Keskikoko; Keskikoko/suuri; Mukautettu; Suuri; Pieni; Pieni/keskikoko; Muu
en: Cap size: Average; Average/Large; Custom; Large; Petite; Petite/Average; Other
pt-PT: Tamanho do boné: Médio; Médio/grande; Personalizado; Grande; Pequeno; Pequeno/médio; Outro